Washington statutes.
RCW 36.165.030

Program application and review process.

(1) A program must establish a C-PACER application and review process to review and evaluate project applications for C-PACER financing, and prescribe the form and manner of the application. At a minimum, an applicant must demonstrate:

(a) That the project provides a benefit to the public, in the form of energy or water resource conservation, reduced public health risk, or reduced public emergency response risk;

(b) For an existing building: (i) Where energy or water usage improvements are proposed, certification by a licensed professional engineer, or other professional listed in the program guidebook, stating that the proposed qualified improvements will either result in more efficient use or conservation of energy or water, the reduction of greenhouse gas emissions, or the addition of renewable sources of energy or water, or (ii) where resilience improvements are proposed, certification by a licensed professional engineer stating that the qualified improvements will result in improved resilience;

(c) For new construction, certification by a licensed professional engineer stating that the proposed qualified improvements will enable the project to exceed the energy efficiency or water efficiency or renewable energy or renewable water or resilience requirements of the current building code.

(2) The program may charge an application fee to cover the costs of establishing and conducting the application review process.

(3) Upon the denial of an application, the program administrator must provide an opportunity for an adjudicative proceeding subject to the applicable provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW.

(4) After an approved project is completed, an applicant must provide the program written verification, as defined in the program guidebook, stating that the qualified project was properly completed and is operating as intended.

(5) No later than one year after the governing body of a county establishes a program under this chapter, it must begin accepting applications and approving applications.

(6) The department of commerce may adopt rules to implement the voluntary statewide program.

[ 2020 c 27 s 4.]